Arkansas, session 2025, SB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-35-301(2), concerning the definitions to
be used in relation to manufactured homes and houses, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) “Manufactured home unit” means a structure constructed for
use as a dwelling, office, or classroom which that is more than eight feet
(8′) in width or sixty feet (60′) in length and is capable of being moved upon
the highways when combined with a pulling vehicle;











*ZRC013*
02/18/2025 12:56:05 PM ZRC013